Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-404
Marriages; how contracted.

Such Indians and their descendants shall procure marriage licenses and have their marriages solemnized and returns thereof made in the manner as provided by the laws of this state for the making of marriage contracts.

Laws 1913, c. 68, § 4, p. 202;

R.S.1913, § 1610;

C.S.1922, § 1559;

C.S.1929, § 42-404;

R.S.1943, § 42-404;

Laws 1989, LB 80, § 1.